Maine, session 132, LD447.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §4401, as amended by PL 1999, c. 20, §1, is further amended to
read:
§4401. Ferry service for North Haven, Vinalhaven, Islesboro, Matinicus Isle, Swan's
Island and Frenchboro
It is the duty of the Department of Transportation to operate a ferry route or routes
between the mainland and the towns of North Haven, Vinalhaven, Islesboro, Matinicus Isle
and Swan's Island for the purpose of transporting vehicles, freight and passengers to and
from these towns, and the department may operate the ferry route or routes to and from
Frenchboro. Ferry service to Matinicus Isle must be at least 12 times per year and may be
up to 36 times per year, with additional service authorized as agreed upon by the residents
of Matinicus Isle and the department, and may be provided by state-owned or privately
contracted vessels. These ferry routes are designated as the "Maine State Ferry Service."
During periods of facility repair or maintenance or during periods of extraordinary demand,
the department may carry out its responsibilities by utilizing privately contracted vessels
to provide additional or substitute service to islands served by the Maine State Ferry Service
as long as the use of privately contracted vessels is in accordance with an agreement
between the department and the State's collective bargaining agent as defined in Title 26,
section 979‑A, subsection 1.
Page 1 - 132LR1219(03)